test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-subst-2tav-u_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - suánju:
    suánju+N+Sg+Nom:  suánju
    suánju+N+Sg+Gen:  suánju
    suánju+N+Sg+Ill:  suánjun
    suánju+N+Sg+Loc:  suánjust
    suánju+N+Sg+Com:  suánjoin
    suánju+N+Sg+Abe:  suánjuttáá
    suánju+N+Ess:  suánnjun
    suánju+N+Pl+Nom:  suánjuh
    suánju+N+Pl+Gen: [suánjui, suánjui]
    suánju+N+Pl+Acc:  suánjuid
    suánju+N+Pl+Ill:  suánjoid
    suánju+N+Pl+Loc:  suánjuin
    suánju+N+Pl+Com:  suánjuiguin
    suánju+N+Pl+Abe:  suánjuittáá

  Noun - nuárju:
    nuárju+N+Sg+Nom:  nuárju
    nuárju+N+Sg+Gen:  nuárju
    nuárju+N+Sg+Ill:  nuárjun
    nuárju+N+Sg+Loc:  nuárjust
    nuárju+N+Sg+Com:  nuárjoin
    nuárju+N+Sg+Abe:  nuárjuttáá
    nuárju+N+Ess:  nuárjun
    nuárju+N+Pl+Nom:  nuárjuh
    nuárju+N+Pl+Gen: [nuárjui, nuárjui]
    nuárju+N+Pl+Acc:  njuárjuid
    nuárju+N+Pl+Ill:  nuárjoid
    nuárju+N+Pl+Loc:  nuárjuin
    nuárju+N+Pl+Com:  nuárjuiguin
    nuárju+N+Pl+Abe:  nuárjuittáá

  Noun - juávkku:
    juávkku+N+Sg+Nom:  juávkku
    juávkku+N+Sg+Gen:  juávhu
    juávkku+N+Sg+Ill:  juávkun
    juávkku+N+Sg+Loc:  juávhust
    juávkku+N+Sg+Com:  juávhoin
    juávkku+N+Sg+Abe:  juávhuttáá
    juávkku+N+Ess:  juávkkun
    juávkku+N+Pl+Nom:  juávhuh
    juávkku+N+Pl+Gen: [juávhui, juávhui]
    juávkku+N+Pl+Acc:  juávhuid
    juávkku+N+Pl+Ill:  juávhoid
    juávkku+N+Pl+Loc:  juávhuin
    juávkku+N+Pl+Com:  juávhuiguin
    juávkku+N+Pl+Abe:  juávhuittáá

  Noun - puákku:
    puákku+N+Sg+Nom:  puákku
    puákku+N+Sg+Gen:  puáhu
    puákku+N+Sg+Ill:  puákun
    puákku+N+Sg+Loc:  puáhust
    puákku+N+Sg+Com:  puáhhoin
    puákku+N+Sg+Abe:  puáhuttáá
    puákku+N+Ess:  puákkun
    puákku+N+Pl+Nom:  puáhuh
    puákku+N+Pl+Gen: [puáhui, puáhui]
    puákku+N+Pl+Acc:  puáhuid
    puákku+N+Pl+Ill:  puáhhoid
    puákku+N+Pl+Loc:  puáhuin
    puákku+N+Pl+Com:  puáhuiguin
    puákku+N+Pl+Abe:  puáhuittáá

  Noun - muállu:
    muállu+N+Sg+Nom:  muállu
    muállu+N+Sg+Gen:  muálu
    muállu+N+Sg+Ill:  muálun
    muállu+N+Sg+Loc:  muálust
    muállu+N+Sg+Com:  muálloin
    muállu+N+Sg+Abe:  muáluttáá
    muállu+N+Ess:  muállun
    muállu+N+Pl+Nom:  muáluh
    muállu+N+Pl+Gen: [muálui, muálui]
    muállu+N+Pl+Acc:  muáluid
    muállu+N+Pl+Ill:  muálloid
    muállu+N+Pl+Loc:  muáluin
    muállu+N+Pl+Com:  muáluiguin
    muállu+N+Pl+Abe:  muáluittáá

  Noun - puállu:
    puállu+N+Sg+Nom:  puállu
    puállu+N+Sg+Gen:  puálu
    puállu+N+Sg+Ill:  puálun
    puállu+N+Sg+Loc:  puálust
    puállu+N+Sg+Com:  puálloin
    puállu+N+Sg+Abe:  puáluttáá
    puállu+N+Ess:  puállun
    puállu+N+Pl+Nom:  puáluh
    puállu+N+Pl+Gen: [puálui, puálui]
    puállu+N+Pl+Acc:  puáluid
    puállu+N+Pl+Ill:  puálloid
    puállu+N+Pl+Loc:  puáluin
    puállu+N+Pl+Com:  puáluiguin
    puállu+N+Pl+Abe:  puáluittáá

  Noun - kuávlu:
    kuávlu+N+Sg+Nom:  kuávlu
    kuávlu+N+Sg+Gen:  kuávlu
    kuávlu+N+Sg+Ill:  kuávlun
    kuávlu+N+Sg+Loc:  kuávlust
    kuávlu+N+Sg+Com:  kuávloin
    kuávlu+N+Sg+Abe:  kuávluttáá
    kuávlu+N+Ess:  kuávlun
    kuávlu+N+Pl+Nom:  kuávluh
    kuávlu+N+Pl+Gen: [kUávlui, kuávlui]
    kuávlu+N+Pl+Acc:  kuávluid
    kuávlu+N+Pl+Ill:  kuávloid
    kuávlu+N+Pl+Loc:  kuávluin
    kuávlu+N+Pl+Com:  kuávluiguin
    kuávlu+N+Pl+Abe:  kuávluittáá

  Noun - tuálu:
    tuálu+N+Sg+Nom:  tuálu
    tuálu+N+Sg+Gen:  tuálo
    tuálu+N+Sg+Ill:  tuálun
    tuálu+N+Sg+Loc:  tuáloost
    tuálu+N+Sg+Com:  tuáloin
    tuálu+N+Sg+Abe:  tuálottáá
    tuálu+N+Ess:  tuállun
    tuálu+N+Pl+Nom:  tuáloh
    tuálu+N+Pl+Gen:  tuáloi
    tuálu+N+Pl+Acc:  tuáloid
    tuálu+N+Pl+Ill:  tuáloid
    tuálu+N+Pl+Loc:  tuáloin
    tuálu+N+Pl+Com:  tuáloiguin
    tuálu+N+Pl+Abe:  tuáloittáá

  Noun - tuálu:
    tuálu+N+Sg+Nom:  tuálu
    tuálu+N+Sg+Gen:  tuálu
    tuálu+N+Sg+Ill:  tuálun
    tuálu+N+Sg+Loc:  tuálust
    tuálu+N+Sg+Com:  tuáloin
    tuálu+N+Sg+Abe:  tuáluttáá
    tuálu+N+Ess:  tuállun
    tuálu+N+Pl+Nom:  tuáluh
    tuálu+N+Pl+Gen: [tuálui, tuálui]
    tuálu+N+Pl+Acc:  tuáluid
    tuálu+N+Pl+Ill:  tuáloid
    tuálu+N+Pl+Loc:  tuáluin
    tuálu+N+Pl+Com:  tuáluiguin
    tuálu+N+Pl+Abe:  tuáluittáá

  Noun - luámu:
    luámu+N+Sg+Nom:  luámu
    luámu+N+Sg+Gen:  luámu
    luámu+N+Sg+Ill:  luámun
    luámu+N+Sg+Loc:  luámust
    luámu+N+Sg+Com:  luámuin
    luámu+N+Sg+Abe:  luámuttáá
    luámu+N+Ess:  luámmun
    luámu+N+Pl+Nom:  luámuh
    luámu+N+Pl+Gen: [luámui, luámui]
    luámu+N+Pl+Acc:  luámuid
    luámu+N+Pl+Ill:  luámuid
    luámu+N+Pl+Loc:  luámuin
    luámu+N+Pl+Com:  luámuiguin
    luámu+N+Pl+Abe:  luámuittáá

  Noun - tuámu:
    tuámu+N+Sg+Nom:  tuámu
    tuámu+N+Sg+Gen:  tuámu
    tuámu+N+Sg+Ill:  tuámun
    tuámu+N+Sg+Loc:  tuámust
    tuámu+N+Sg+Com:  tuámoin
    tuámu+N+Sg+Abe:  tuámuttáá
    tuámu+N+Ess:  tuámmun
    tuámu+N+Pl+Nom:  tuámuh
    tuámu+N+Pl+Gen: [tuámui, tuámui]
    tuámu+N+Pl+Acc:  tuámuid
    tuámu+N+Pl+Ill:  tuámoid
    tuámu+N+Pl+Loc:  tuámuin
    tuámu+N+Pl+Com:  tuámuiguin
    tuámu+N+Pl+Abe:  tuámuittáá

  Noun - vuáru:
    vuáru+N+Sg+Nom:  vuáru
    vuáru+N+Sg+Gen:  vuáro
    vuáru+N+Sg+Ill:  vuárun
    vuáru+N+Sg+Loc:  vuároost
    vuáru+N+Sg+Com:  vuároin
    vuáru+N+Sg+Abe:  vuárottáá
    vuáru+N+Ess:  vuárrun
    vuáru+N+Pl+Nom:  vuároh
    vuáru+N+Pl+Gen:  vuároi
    vuáru+N+Pl+Acc:  vuároid
    vuáru+N+Pl+Ill:  vuároid
    vuáru+N+Pl+Loc:  vuároin
    vuáru+N+Pl+Com:  vuároiguin
    vuáru+N+Pl+Abe:  vuárvoittáá

  Noun - vuálppu:
    vuálppu+N+Sg+Nom:  vuálppu
    vuálppu+N+Sg+Gen:  vuálpu
    vuálppu+N+Sg+Ill:  vuálpun
    vuálppu+N+Sg+Loc:  vuálpust
    vuálppu+N+Sg+Com:  vuálppoin
    vuálppu+N+Sg+Abe:  vuálputtáá
    vuálppu+N+Ess:  vuálppun
    vuálppu+N+Pl+Nom:  vuálpuh
    vuálppu+N+Pl+Gen: [vuálpui, vuálpui]
    vuálppu+N+Pl+Acc:  vuálpuid
    vuálppu+N+Pl+Ill:  vuálppoid
    vuálppu+N+Pl+Loc:  vuálpuin
    vuálppu+N+Pl+Com:  vuálpuiguin
    vuálppu+N+Pl+Abe:  vuálpuittáá

  Noun - huáppu:
    huáppu+N+Sg+Nom:  huáppu
    huáppu+N+Sg+Gen:  huápu
    huáppu+N+Sg+Ill:  huápun
    huáppu+N+Sg+Loc:  huápust
    huáppu+N+Sg+Com:  huáppoin
    huáppu+N+Sg+Abe:  huáputtáá
    huáppu+N+Ess:  huáppun
    huáppu+N+Pl+Nom:  huápuh
    huáppu+N+Pl+Gen: [huápui, huápui]
    huáppu+N+Pl+Acc:  huápuid
    huáppu+N+Pl+Ill:  huáppoid
    huáppu+N+Pl+Loc:  huápuin
    huáppu+N+Pl+Com:  huápuiguin
    huáppu+N+Pl+Abe:  huápuittáá

  Noun - skuáppu:
    skuáppu+N+Sg+Nom:  skuáppu
    skuáppu+N+Sg+Gen:  skuápu
    skuáppu+N+Sg+Ill:  skuápun
    skuáppu+N+Sg+Loc:  skuápust
    skuáppu+N+Sg+Com:  skuáppoin
    skuáppu+N+Sg+Abe:  skuáputtáá
    skuáppu+N+Ess:  skuáppun
    skuáppu+N+Pl+Nom:  skuápuh
    skuáppu+N+Pl+Gen: [skuápui, skuápui]
    skuáppu+N+Pl+Acc:  skuápuid
    skuáppu+N+Pl+Ill:  skuáppoid
    skuáppu+N+Pl+Loc:  skuápuin
    skuáppu+N+Pl+Com:  skuápuiguin
    skuáppu+N+Pl+Abe:  skuápuittáá

  Noun - tuáru:
    tuáru+N+Sg+Nom:  tuáru
    tuáru+N+Sg+Gen:  tuáru
    tuáru+N+Sg+Ill:  tuárun
    tuáru+N+Sg+Loc:  tuárust
    tuáru+N+Sg+Com:  tuároin
    tuáru+N+Sg+Abe:  tuáruttáá
    tuáru+N+Ess:  tuárrun
    tuáru+N+Pl+Nom:  tuáruh
    tuáru+N+Pl+Gen: [tuárui, tuárui]
    tuáru+N+Pl+Acc:  tuáruid
    tuáru+N+Pl+Ill:  tuároid
    tuáru+N+Pl+Loc:  tuáruin
    tuáru+N+Pl+Com:  tuáruiguin
    tuáru+N+Pl+Abe:  tuáruittáá

  Noun - vuáru:
    vuáru+N+Sg+Nom:  vuáru
    vuáru+N+Sg+Gen:  vuáru
    vuáru+N+Sg+Ill:  vuárun
    vuáru+N+Sg+Loc:  vuárust
    vuáru+N+Sg+Com:  vuároin
    vuáru+N+Sg+Abe:  vuáruttáá
    vuáru+N+Ess:  vuárrun
    vuáru+N+Pl+Nom:  vuáruh
    vuáru+N+Pl+Gen: [vuárui, vuárui]
    vuáru+N+Pl+Acc:  vuáruid
    vuáru+N+Pl+Ill:  vuároid
    vuáru+N+Pl+Loc:  vuáruin
    vuáru+N+Pl+Com:  vuáruiguin
    vuáru+N+Pl+Abe:  vuáruittáá

  Noun - kuáhtu:
    kuáhtu+N+Sg+Nom:  kuáhtu
    kuáhtu+N+Sg+Gen:  kuáhtu
    kuáhtu+N+Sg+Ill:  kuáhtun
    kuáhtu+N+Sg+Loc:  kuáhtust
    kuáhtu+N+Sg+Com:  kuáhtoin
    kuáhtu+N+Sg+Abe:  kuáhtuttáá
    kuáhtu+N+Ess:  kuáhtun
    kuáhtu+N+Pl+Nom:  kuáhtuh
    kuáhtu+N+Pl+Gen: [kuáhtui, kuáhtui]
    kuáhtu+N+Pl+Acc:  kuáhtuid
    kuáhtu+N+Pl+Ill:  kuáhtoid
    kuáhtu+N+Pl+Loc:  kuáhtuin
    kuáhtu+N+Pl+Com:  kuÀhtuiguin
    kuáhtu+N+Pl+Abe:  kuáhtuittáá

  Noun - uástu:
    uástu+N+Sg+Nom:  uástu
    uástu+N+Sg+Gen:  uástu
    uástu+N+Sg+Ill:  uástun
    uástu+N+Sg+Loc:  uástust
    uástu+N+Sg+Com:  uástoin
    uástu+N+Sg+Abe:  uástuttáá
    uástu+N+Ess:  uástun
    uástu+N+Pl+Nom:  uástuh
    uástu+N+Pl+Gen: [uástui, uástui]
    uástu+N+Pl+Acc:  uástuid
    uástu+N+Pl+Ill:  uástoid
    uástu+N+Pl+Loc:  uástuin
    uástu+N+Pl+Com:  uástuiguin
    uástu+N+Pl+Abe:  uástuittáá

  Noun - muátu:
    muátu+N+Sg+Nom:  muátu
    muátu+N+Sg+Gen:  muáđo
    muátu+N+Sg+Ill:  muátun
    muátu+N+Sg+Loc:  muáđoost
    muátu+N+Sg+Com:  muáđoin
    muátu+N+Sg+Abe:  muáđottáá
    muátu+N+Ess:  muáttun
    muátu+N+Pl+Nom:  muáđoh
    muátu+N+Pl+Gen:  muáđoi
    muátu+N+Pl+Acc:  muáđoid
    muátu+N+Pl+Ill:  muáđoid
    muátu+N+Pl+Loc:  muáđoin
    muátu+N+Pl+Com:  muáđoiguin
    muátu+N+Pl+Abe:  muáđoittáá

  Noun - tuáttu:
    tuáttu+N+Sg+Nom:  tuáttu
    tuáttu+N+Sg+Gen:  tuátu
    tuáttu+N+Sg+Ill:  tuátun
    tuáttu+N+Sg+Loc:  tuátust
    tuáttu+N+Sg+Com:  tuáttoin
    tuáttu+N+Sg+Abe:  tuátuttáá
    tuáttu+N+Ess:  tuáttun
    tuáttu+N+Pl+Nom:  tuátuh
    tuáttu+N+Pl+Gen: [tuátui, tuátui]
    tuáttu+N+Pl+Acc:  tuátuid
    tuáttu+N+Pl+Ill:  tuáttoid
    tuáttu+N+Pl+Loc:  tuátuin
    tuáttu+N+Pl+Com:  tuátuiguin
    tuáttu+N+Pl+Abe:  tuátuittáá

  Noun - muátu:
    muátu+N+Sg+Nom:  muátu
    muátu+N+Sg+Gen:  muáđu
    muátu+N+Sg+Ill:  muátun
    muátu+N+Sg+Loc:  muáđust
    muátu+N+Sg+Com:  muáđoin
    muátu+N+Sg+Abe:  muáđuttáá
    muátu+N+Ess:  muáttun
    muátu+N+Pl+Nom:  muáđuh
    muátu+N+Pl+Gen: [muáđui, muáđui]
    muátu+N+Pl+Acc:  muáđuid
    muátu+N+Pl+Ill:  muáđoid
    muátu+N+Pl+Loc:  muáđuin
    muátu+N+Pl+Com:  muáđuiguin
    muátu+N+Pl+Abe:  muáđuittáá

  Noun - ruávvu:
    ruávvu+N+Sg+Nom:  ruávvu
    ruávvu+N+Sg+Gen:  ruávu
    ruávvu+N+Sg+Ill:  ruávun
    ruávvu+N+Sg+Loc:  ruávust
    ruávvu+N+Sg+Com:  ruávvoin
    ruávvu+N+Sg+Abe:  ruávuttáá
    ruávvu+N+Ess:  ruávvun
    ruávvu+N+Pl+Nom:  ruávuh
    ruávvu+N+Pl+Gen: [ruávui, ruávui]
    ruávvu+N+Pl+Acc:  ruávuid
    ruávvu+N+Pl+Ill:  ruávvoid
    ruávvu+N+Pl+Loc:  ruávuin
    ruávvu+N+Pl+Com:  ruávuiguin
    ruávvu+N+Pl+Abe:  ruávuittáá

  Noun - puáđu:
    puáđu+N+Sg+Nom:  puáđu
    puáđu+N+Sg+Gen:  puáđu
    puáđu+N+Sg+Ill:  puáđun
    puáđu+N+Sg+Loc:  puáđust
    puáđu+N+Sg+Com:  puáđoin
    puáđu+N+Sg+Abe:  puáđuttáá
    puáđu+N+Ess:  puáđđun
    puáđu+N+Pl+Nom:  puáđuh
    puáđu+N+Pl+Gen: [puáđui, puáđui]
    puáđu+N+Pl+Acc:  puáđuid
    puáđu+N+Pl+Ill:  puáđoid
    puáđu+N+Pl+Loc:  puáđuin
    puáđu+N+Pl+Com:  puáđuiguin
    puáđu+N+Pl+Abe:  puáđuittáá

  Noun - tuáršu:
    tuáršu+N+Sg+Nom:  tuáršu
    tuáršu+N+Sg+Gen:  tuáršu
    tuáršu+N+Sg+Ill:  tuáršun
    tuáršu+N+Sg+Loc:  tuáršust
    tuáršu+N+Sg+Com:  tuáršoin
    tuáršu+N+Sg+Abe:  tuáršuttáá
    tuáršu+N+Ess:  tuáršun
    tuáršu+N+Pl+Nom:  tuáršuh
    tuáršu+N+Pl+Gen: [tuáršui, tuáršui]
    tuáršu+N+Pl+Acc:  tuáršuid
    tuáršu+N+Pl+Ill:  tuáršoid
    tuáršu+N+Pl+Loc:  tuáršuin
    tuáršu+N+Pl+Com:  tuáršuiguin
    tuáršu+N+Pl+Abe:  tuáršuittáá

  Noun - ráávhu:
    ráávhu+N+Sg+Nom:  ráávhu
    ráávhu+N+Sg+Gen:  ráávhu
    ráávhu+N+Sg+Ill:  ráávhun
    ráávhu+N+Sg+Loc:  ráávhust
    ráávhu+N+Sg+Com:  rávhoin
    ráávhu+N+Sg+Abe:  rávhuttáá
    ráávhu+N+Ess:  ráávhun
    ráávhu+N+Pl+Nom:  ráávhuh
    ráávhu+N+Pl+Gen:  ráávhui
    ráávhu+N+Pl+Acc:  ráávhuid
    ráávhu+N+Pl+Ill:  rávhoid
    ráávhu+N+Pl+Loc:  ráávhuin
    ráávhu+N+Pl+Com:  rávhuguin
    ráávhu+N+Pl+Abe:  rávhuittáá

  Noun - mááhu:
    mááhu+N+Sg+Nom:  mááhu
    mááhu+N+Sg+Gen:  máávu
    mááhu+N+Sg+Ill:  mááhun
    mááhu+N+Sg+Loc:  máávust
    mááhu+N+Sg+Com:  mávvoin
    mááhu+N+Sg+Abe:  mávuttáá
    mááhu+N+Ess:  mááhhun
    mááhu+N+Pl+Nom:  máávuh
    mááhu+N+Pl+Gen: [máávui, mávui]
    mááhu+N+Pl+Acc:  máávuid
    mááhu+N+Pl+Ill:  mávvoid
    mááhu+N+Pl+Loc:  máávuin
    mááhu+N+Pl+Com:  mávuiguin
    mááhu+N+Pl+Abe:  mávuittáá
